Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
Subpart 2 Receipts Not Normally Apportioned

53-12-420.
Principal receipts.

A trustee shall allocate to principal:

To the extent not allocated to income under this article, assets received from a transferor during the transferor’s lifetime, a decedent’s estate, a trust with a terminating income interest, or a payor under a contract naming the trust or its trustee as beneficiary;

Money or other property received from the sale, exchange, liquidation, or change in form of a principal asset, including realized profit, subject to the provisions of this article;

Amounts recovered from third parties to reimburse the trust because of disbursements described in paragraph (7) of subsection (a) of Code Section 53-12-451 or for other reasons to the extent not based on the loss of income;

Proceeds of property taken by eminent domain, but a separate award made for the loss of income with respect to an accounting period during which a current income beneficiary had a mandatory income interest shall be income;

Net income received in an accounting period during which there is no beneficiary to whom a trustee may or must distribute income; and

Other receipts as provided in this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-420

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131; Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 53/HB 142.

53-12-421.
Rental property.

To the extent that a trustee accounts for receipts from rental property pursuant to this Code section, the trustee shall allocate to income an amount received as rent of real or personal property, including an amount received for cancellation or renewal of a lease. An amount received as a refundable deposit, including a security deposit or a deposit that is to be applied as rent for future periods, shall be added to principal and held subject to the terms of the lease and shall not be available for distribution to a beneficiary until the trustee’s contractual obligations have been satisfied with respect to such amount.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-421

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

53-12-422.
Obligation to pay money.

An amount received as interest, whether determined at a fixed, variable, or floating rate, on an obligation to pay money to the trustee, including an amount received as consideration for prepaying principal, shall be allocated to income without any provision for amortization of premium.

A trustee shall allocate to principal an amount received from the sale, redemption, or other disposition of an obligation to pay money to the trustee more than one year after it is purchased or acquired by the trustee, including an obligation whose purchase price or value when it is acquired is less than its value at maturity. If the obligation matures within one year after it is purchased or acquired by the trustee, an amount received in excess of its purchase price or its value when acquired by the trust shall be allocated to income.

This Code section shall not apply to an obligation to which Code Section 53-12-425 through 53-12-428, 53-12-430, or 53-12-431 applies.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-422

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

53-12-423.
Insurance policies and similar contracts.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this Code section, a trustee shall allocate to principal the proceeds of a life insurance policy or other contract in which the trust or its trustee is named as beneficiary, including a contract that insures the trust or its trustee against loss for damage to, destruction of, or loss of title to a trust asset. The trustee shall allocate dividends on an insurance policy to income if the premiums on the policy are paid from income and to principal if the premiums are paid from principal.

A trustee shall allocate to income proceeds of a contract that insures the trustee against loss of occupancy or other use by an income beneficiary, loss of income, or, subject to Code Section 53-12-412, loss of profits from a business.

This Code section shall not apply to a contract to which Code Section 53-12-425 applies.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-423

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

53-12-424.
Insubstantial allocations not required.

If a trustee determines that an allocation between principal and income required by Code Sections 53-12-425 through 53-12-428 or Code Section 53-12-431 is insubstantial, the trustee may allocate the entire amount to principal unless one of the circumstances described in Code Section 53-12-361 applies to the allocation. Such power may be exercised by a cotrustee in the circumstances described in Code Section 53-12-361 and may be released for the reasons and in the manner described in such Code section. An allocation shall be presumed to be insubstantial if:

The amount of the allocation would increase or decrease net income in an accounting period, as determined before the allocation, by less than 10 percent; or

The value of the asset producing the receipt for which the allocation would be made is less than 10 percent of the total value of the trust’s assets at the beginning of the accounting period.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-424

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

53-12-425.
Deferred compensation, annuities, and similar payments.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Payment” means a payment that a trustee may receive over a fixed number of years or during the life of one or more individuals because of services rendered or property transferred to the payor in exchange for future payments. Such term includes a payment made in money or property from the payor’s general assets or from a separate fund created by the payor. Such term also includes any payment from a separate fund, regardless of the reason for the payment.

“Separate fund” includes a private or commercial annuity, an individual retirement account, and a pension, profit-sharing, stock-bonus, or stock-ownership plan.

To the extent that a payment is characterized as interest or a dividend or a payment made in lieu of interest or a dividend, a trustee shall allocate it to income. The trustee shall allocate to principal the balance of the payment and any other payment received in the same accounting period that is not characterized as interest, a dividend, or an equivalent payment.

If no part of a payment is characterized as interest, a dividend, or an equivalent payment, and all or part of the payment is required to be made, a trustee shall allocate to income 10 percent of the part that is required to be made during the accounting period and the balance to principal. If no part of a payment is required to be made or the payment received is the entire amount to which the trustee is entitled, the trustee shall allocate the entire payment to principal. For purposes of this subsection, a payment shall not be required to be made to the extent that it is made because the trustee exercises a right of withdrawal.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e) of this Code section, subsections (f) and (g) of this Code section shall apply, and subsections (b) and (c) of this Code section shall not apply, in determining the allocation of a payment made from a separate fund to:

A trust to which an election to qualify for a marital deduction under Section 2056(b)(7) of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986 has been made; or

A trust that qualifies for the marital deduction under Section 2056(b)(5) of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986.

Subsections (d), (f), and (g) of this Code section shall not apply if and to the extent that the series of payments would, without the application of subsection (d) of this Code section, qualify for the marital deduction under Section 2056(b)(7)(C) of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986.

A trustee shall determine the internal income of each separate fund for the accounting period as if the separate fund were a trust subject to this article. Upon request of the surviving spouse, the trustee shall demand of the person administering the separate fund that this internal income be distributed to the trust. The trustee shall allocate a payment from the separate fund to income to the extent of the internal income of the separate fund and distribute that amount to the surviving spouse. The trustee shall allocate the balance to principal. Upon request of the surviving spouse, the trustee shall allocate principal to income to the extent the internal income of the separate fund exceeds payments made from the separate fund to the trust during the accounting period.

If a trustee cannot determine the internal income of a separate fund but can determine the value of such separate fund, the internal income of such separate fund shall be deemed to be equal to 4 percent of the fund’s value, according to the most recent statement of value preceding the beginning of the accounting period. If the trustee can determine neither the internal income of the separate fund nor the fund’s value, the internal income of the fund shall be deemed to equal the product of the interest rate and the present value of the expected future payments, as determined under Section 7520 of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986 for the month preceding the accounting period for which the computation is made.

This Code section shall not apply to payments to which Code Section 53-12-426 applies.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-425

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131; Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 53/HB 142.

53-12-426.
Liquidating asset.

As used in this Code section, the term “liquidating asset” means an asset whose value will diminish or terminate because such asset is expected to produce receipts for a period of limited duration. Such term includes a leasehold, patent, copyright, royalty right, and right to receive payments during a period of more than one year under an arrangement that does not provide for the payment of interest on the unpaid balance. Such term shall not include a payment subject to Code Section 53-12-425, resources subject to Code Section 53-12-427, timber subject to Code Section 53-12-428, an activity subject to Code Section 53-12-430, an asset subject to Code Section 53-12-431, or any asset for which the trustee establishes a reserve for depreciation under Code Section 53-12-452.

A trustee shall allocate to income 10 percent of the receipts from a liquidating asset and the balance to principal.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-426

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

53-12-427.
Minerals, water, and other natural resources.

To the extent that a trustee accounts for receipts from an interest in minerals or other natural resources pursuant to this Code section, the trustee shall allocate them as follows:

If received as nominal delay rental or nominal annual rent on a lease, a receipt shall be allocated to income;

If received from a production payment, a receipt shall be allocated to income if and to the extent that the agreement creating the production payment provides a factor for interest or its equivalent. The balance shall be allocated to principal;

If an amount received as a royalty, shut-in-well payment, take-or-pay payment, bonus, or delay rental is more than nominal, 90 percent shall be allocated to principal and the balance to income; and

If an amount is received from a working interest or any other interest not provided for in paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of this subsection, 90 percent of the net amount received shall be allocated to principal and the balance to income.

An amount received on account of an interest in water that is renewable shall be allocated to income. If the water is not renewable, 90 percent of the amount shall be allocated to principal and the balance to income.

This Code section shall apply whether or not a decedent or donor was extracting minerals, water, or other natural resources before the interest became subject to the trust.

If a trust owns an interest in minerals, water, or other natural resources on July 1, 2010, the trustee may allocate receipts from the interest as provided in this Code section or in the manner used by the trustee before July 1, 2010. If the trust acquires an interest in minerals, water, or other natural resources after July 1, 2010, the trustee shall allocate receipts from the interest as provided in this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-427

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

53-12-428.
Timber.

To the extent that a trustee accounts for receipts from the sale of timber and related products pursuant to this Code section, the trustee shall allocate the net receipts:

To income to the extent that the amount of timber removed from the land does not exceed the rate of growth of the timber during the accounting periods in which a beneficiary has a mandatory income interest;

To principal to the extent that the amount of timber removed from the land exceeds the rate of growth of the timber or the net receipts are from the sale of standing timber;

To or between income and principal if the net receipts are from the lease of timberland or from a contract to cut timber from land owned by a trust by determining the amount of timber removed from the land under the lease or contract and applying the rules in paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection; or

To principal to the extent that advance payments, bonuses, and other payments are not allocated pursuant to paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of this subsection.

In determining net receipts to be allocated pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section, a trustee shall deduct and transfer to principal a reasonable amount for depletion.

This Code section shall apply whether or not a decedent or transferor was harvesting timber from the property before it became subject to the trust.

If a trust owns an interest in timberland on July 1, 2010, the trustee may allocate net receipts from the sale of timber and related products as provided in this Code section or in the manner used by the trustee before July 1, 2010. If the trust acquires an interest in timberland after July 1, 2010, the trustee shall allocate net receipts from the sale of timber and related products as provided in this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-428

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

53-12-429.
Property not productive of income.

If a marital deduction is allowed for all or part of a trust whose assets consist substantially of property that does not provide the spouse with sufficient income from or use of the trust assets, and if the amounts that the trustee transfers from principal to income under Code Section 53-12-361 and distributes to the spouse from principal pursuant to the terms of the trust are insufficient to provide the spouse with the beneficial enjoyment required to obtain the marital deduction, the spouse may require the trustee to make property productive of income, convert property within a reasonable time, or exercise the power conferred by Code Section 53-12-361. The trustee may decide which action or combination of actions to take.

In cases not governed by subsection (a) of this Code section, proceeds from the sale or other disposition of an asset shall be principal without regard to the amount of income the asset produces during any accounting period.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-429

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

53-12-430.
Derivatives and options.

As used in this Code section, the term “derivative” means a contract or financial instrument or a combination of contracts and financial instruments which gives a trust the right or obligation to participate in some or all changes in the price of a tangible or intangible asset or group of assets, or changes in a rate, an index of prices or rates, or other market indicator for an asset or a group of assets.

To the extent that a trustee does not account under Code Section 53-12-412 for transactions in derivatives, the trustee shall allocate to principal receipts from and disbursements made in connection with those transactions.

If a trustee grants an option to buy property from the trust, whether or not the trust owns the property when the option is granted, grants an option that permits another person to sell property to the trust, or acquires an option to buy property for the trust or an option to sell an asset owned by the trust, and the trustee or other owner of the asset is required to deliver the asset if the option is exercised, an amount received for granting the option shall be allocated to principal. An amount paid to acquire the option shall be paid from principal. A gain or loss realized upon the exercise of an option, including an option granted to a settlor of the trust for services rendered, shall be allocated to principal.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-430

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

53-12-431.
Asset-backed securities.

As used in this Code section, the term “asset-backed security” means an asset whose value is based upon the right it gives the owner to receive distributions from the proceeds of financial assets that provide collateral for the security. Such term includes an asset that gives the owner the right to receive from the collateral financial assets only the interest or other current return or only the proceeds other than interest or current return. Such term shall not include an asset to which Code Section 53-12-410 or 53-12-425 applies.

If a trust receives a payment from interest or other current return and from other proceeds of the collateral financial assets, the trustee shall allocate to income the portion of the payment which the payor identifies as being from interest or other current return and shall allocate the balance of the payment to principal.

If a trust receives one or more payments in exchange for the trust’s entire interest in an asset-backed security in one accounting period, the trustee shall allocate the payments to principal. If a payment is one of a series of payments that will result in the liquidation of the trust’s interest in the asset-backed security over more than one accounting period, the trustee shall allocate 10 percent of the payment to income and the balance to principal.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-431

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131; Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 53/HB 142.